Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1507
Temporary training license, defined.

Temporary training license means a hearing instrument specialist license issued while the applicant is in training to become a licensed hearing instrument specialist.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 571;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 25;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 52.